Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.801

Construction and application of chapter and limited liability company agreement.

(1) The rule that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed has no application to this chapter.

(2) It is the policy of this chapter to give the maximum effect to the principle of freedom of contract and to the enforceability of limited liability company agreements.

(3) Unless the context otherwise requires, as used in this chapter, the singular includes the plural and the plural may refer to only the singular.

[ 2015 c 188 s 101.]